Particles.lexc
! List of Iñapari particles

LEXICON Particles
a'aimani # ;
ahamá # ;
ahamátu # ;
ahamátua # ;
aníma # ;
apua # ;
a'ahahama # ;
haywáy'uy # ;
ha'aynani # ;
hɨra # ;
itapun # ;
mahɨ'anipa # ;
pumaymí # ;
tama # ;
